California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 the commission orders the erection of a new structure, it may also fix the site thereof. If the order requires joint action by two or more public utilities, the commission shall so notify them and shall fix a reasonable time within which they may agree upon the portion or division of the cost which each shall bear. If at the expiration of such time the public utilities fail to file with the commission a statement that an agreement has been made for a division or apportionment of the cost, the commission may, after further hearing, make an order fixing the proportion of such cost to be borne by each public utility and the manner in which payment shall be made or secured.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

762.5.

The commission, as a basis for making any order pursuant to the provisions of Section 762 relating to location of structures, shall give consideration to, and include in its order findings upon, the following factors:

(a) Community values.

(b) Recreational and park areas.

(c) Historical and aesthetic values.

(d) Influence on environment, except that in the case of any structure located in another state
 which will be subject to environmental impact review pursuant to the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (Chapter 55 (commencing with Section 4321) of Title 42 of the United States Code) or similar state laws in the other state, the commission shall not consider influence on the environment unless any emissions or discharges therefrom would have a significant influence on the environment of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

763.

(a) Whenever the commission, after a hearing, finds that any railroad corporation or street railroad corporation does not run a sufficient number of trains or cars, or possess or operate sufficient motive power, reasonably to accommodate the traffic, passenger or freight, transported by or offered for transportation to it, or does not run its trains or cars with sufficient frequency or at a reasonable or proper time having regard to safety, or does not stop its trains or cars at proper places, or does not run any train or car upon a reasonable
 time schedule for the run, the commission may make an order directing such corporation to increase the number of its trains or cars or its motive power or to change the time for starting its trains or cars or to change the time schedule for the run of any train or car, or to change the stopping place or places thereof. The commission may make any other order that it determines to be reasonably necessary to accommodate and transport the traffic, passenger or freight, transported or offered for transportation. 

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

764.

(a) An electrical corporation that has a contract for private fire safety and prevention, mitigation, or maintenance services, shall only use those services for the direct defense of utility infrastructure when conducting fire safety and prevention, mitigation, and maintenance activities as determined to be appropriate by the electrical corporation.

(b) An electrical corporation that has a contract for private fire safety and prevention, mitigation, or maintenance services shall make an effort to reduce or eliminate the use of contract private fire safety and prevention, mitigation, and maintenance personnel in favor of employing highly skilled and apprenticed personnel to perform those services in direct defense of utility infrastructure in
 collaboration with public agency fire departments having jurisdiction.

(c) Nothing in this section prohibits an electrical corporation from contracting with a public agency fire department or relevant jurisdiction for the purposes of providing fire safety and prevention, mitigation, or maintenance services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 31.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

764.5.

(a) A fire protection district may require an electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility to notify the fire protection district at least 24 hours before performing
 a prescribed or controlled burn.

(b) If an electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility cannot provide 24 hours’ notice pursuant to subdivision (a) due to unforeseen circumstances, the electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility shall notify the fire protection district at the earliest possible time.

(c) An electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility shall provide notice to a fire protection district pursuant to this section by both telephone and email.

(d) This section does not limit or otherwise affect the ability of a fire protection district or any other local agency to require
 different notice for a prescribed or controlled burn, or impose other requirements allowable by law regarding a prescribed or controlled burn.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 753, Sec. 1.   (AB 3062)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

765.

(a) When the federal National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) submits a safety recommendation letter concerning rail safety to the commission, the commission shall provide the NTSB with a formal written response to each recommendation no later than 90 days after receiving the letter. The response shall state one of the following:

(1) The
 commission’s intent to implement the recommendations in full, with a proposed timetable for implementation of the recommendations.

(2) The commission’s intent to implement part of the recommendations, with a proposed timetable for implementation of those recommendations, and detailed reasons for the commission’s refusal to implement those recommendations that the commission does not intend to implement.

(3) The commission’s refusal to implement the recommendations, with detailed reasons for the commission’s refusal to implement the recommendations.

(b) If the NTSB issues a safety recommendation letter concerning any commission-regulated rail facility to the United States Department of Transportation, the Federal Transit Administration, a commission-regulated rail operator, or the commission, or if the Federal Transit
 Administration issues a safety advisory concerning any commission-regulated rail facility, the commission shall determine if implementation of the recommendation or advisory is appropriate. The basis for the commission’s determination shall be detailed in writing and shall be approved by a majority vote of the commission.

(c) If the commission determines that a safety recommendation made by the NTSB is appropriate, or that action concerning a safety advisory is necessary, the commission shall issue orders or adopt rules to implement the safety recommendation or advisory as soon as practicable. In implementing the safety recommendation or advisory, the commission shall consider whether a more effective, or equally effective and less costly, alternative exists to address the safety issue that the recommendation or advisory addresses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 21.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

765.5.

(a) The purpose of this section is to provide that the commission takes all appropriate action necessary to ensure the safe operation of railroads in this state.

(b) The commission shall dedicate sufficient resources necessary to adequately carry out the State Participation Program for the regulation of rail transportation of hazardous materials as authorized by the Hazardous Material Transportation Uniform Safety Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-615).

(c) On or before July 1, 1992, the commission shall hire a minimum of six additional rail inspectors who are or shall become federally certified, consisting of three additional motive power and equipment inspectors, two signal inspectors, and one operating practices inspector, for the purpose of enforcing compliance by railroads operating in this state with state and federal safety regulations.

(d) On or before July 1, 1992, the commission shall establish, by regulation, a minimum inspection standard to ensure, at the time of inspection, that railroad locomotives, equipment, and facilities located in class I railroad yards in California will be inspected not less frequently than every 120 days, and inspection of all branch and main line track not less frequently than every 12 months.

(e) Commencing July 1, 2008, in
 addition to the minimum inspections undertaken pursuant to subdivision (d), the commission shall conduct focused inspections of railroad yards and track, either in coordination with the Federal Railroad Administration, or as the commission determines to be necessary. The focused inspection program shall target railroad yards and track that pose the greatest safety risk, based on inspection data, accident history, and rail traffic density.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 885, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

765.9.

Federal funds available to the commission for rail safety inspection and enforcement purposes shall be allocated to eligible passenger and freight rail activities on a proportionate basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 767, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

766.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing finds that a physical connection can reasonably be made between the lines of two or more telephone corporations or two or more telegraph corporations whose lines can be made to form a continuous line of communication, by the construction and maintenance of suitable connections for the transfer of messages or conversations, and that public convenience and necessity will be served thereby, or finds that two or more telegraph or telephone corporations have failed to establish joint rates, tolls, or charges for service by or over their lines, and that joint rates, tolls, or charges ought to be established, the commission may, by its order,
 require that such connection be made on the payment of such compensation, if any, as it finds to be just and reasonable, except where the purpose of the connection is primarily to secure the transmission of local messages or conversations between points within the same city, or city and county. The commission may, by order, require that conversations be transmitted and messages transferred over such connection under such rules as it may establish, and may prescribe through lines and joint rates, tolls, and charges. If such telephone or telegraph corporations do not agree upon the division between them of the cost of such physical connection or connections or the division of such joint rates, tolls, or charges established by the commission over such through lines, the commission may after further hearing, establish such division by supplemental order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

766.5.

The commission shall investigate the practices of every telephone corporation in billing its subscribers for telephone calls, including, but not limited to, whether a corporation is unable to determine whether any telephone call was not completed and as a consequence may charge the subscriber for that uncompleted call. If the commission finds that any corporation does not have the capability of determining in every instance whether a call placed by a subscriber was completed, the commission shall require the corporation to furnish written notice, in a form and manner approved by the commission, to its subscribers of its billing practices, including, but not
 limited to, its practice of charging for calls placed but not completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 712, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

767.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing had upon its own motion or upon complaint of a public utility affected, finds that public convenience and necessity require the use by one public utility of all or any part of the conduits, subways, tracks, wires, poles, pipes, or other equipment, on, over, or under any street or highway, and belonging to another public utility, and that such use will not result in irreparable injury to the owner or other users of such property or equipment or in any substantial detriment to the service, and that such public utilities have failed to agree upon such use or the terms and conditions or compensation therefor, the commission may by order
 direct that such use be permitted, and prescribe a reasonable compensation and reasonable terms and conditions for the joint use. If such use is directed, the public utility to whom the use is permitted shall be liable to the owner or other users for such damage as may result therefrom to the property of the owner or other users thereof, and the commission may ascertain and direct the payment, prior to such use, of fair and just compensation for damage suffered, if any.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

767.5.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Public utility” includes any person, firm, or corporation, except a publicly owned public utility, which owns or controls, or in combination jointly owns or controls, support structures or rights-of-way used or useful, in whole or in part, for wire communication.

(2) “Support structure” includes, but is not limited to, a utility pole, anchor, duct, conduit, manhole, or handhole.

(3) “Pole attachment” means any attachment to surplus space, or use of excess capacity, by a cable television corporation for a wire communication system on or in any support structure located on or in any right-of-way or easement owned, controlled, or used by a public utility.

(4) “Surplus space” means that portion of the usable space on a utility pole which has the necessary clearance from other pole users, as required by the orders and regulations of the commission, to allow its use by a cable television corporation for a pole attachment.

(5) “Excess capacity” means volume or capacity in a duct, conduit, or support structure other than a utility pole or anchor which can be used, pursuant to the orders and regulations of the commission, for a pole attachment.

(6) “Usable space” means the total distance
 between the top of the utility pole and the lowest possible attachment point that provides the minimum allowable vertical clearance.

(7) “Minimum allowable vertical clearance” means the minimum clearance for communication conductors along rights-of-way or other areas as specified in the orders and regulations of the commission.

(8) “Rearrangements” means work performed, at the request of a cable television corporation, to, on, or in an existing support structure to create such surplus space or excess capacity as is necessary to make it usable for a pole attachment. When an existing support structure does not contain adequate surplus space or excess capacity and cannot be so rearranged as to create the required surplus space or excess capacity for a pole attachment, “rearrangements” shall include replacement, at the request of a cable television corporation, of the support
 structure in order to provide adequate surplus space or excess capacity. 

(9) “Annual cost of ownership” means the sum of the annual capital costs and annual operation costs of the support structure which shall be the average costs of all similar support structures owned by the public utility. The basis for computation of annual capital costs shall be historical capital costs less depreciation. The accounts upon which the historical capital costs are determined shall include a credit for all reimbursed capital costs of the public utility. Depreciation shall be based upon the average service life of the support structure. As used in this paragraph, “annual cost of ownership” shall not include costs for any property not necessary for a pole attachment.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that public utilities have dedicated a portion of such support structures to cable television
 corporations for pole attachments in that public utilities have made available, through a course of conduct covering many years, surplus space and excess capacity on and in their support structures for use by cable television corporations for pole attachments, and that the provision by such public utilities of surplus space and excess capacity for such pole attachments is a public utility service delivered by public utilities to cable television corporations.

The Legislature further finds and declares that it is in the interests of the people of California for public utilities to continue to make available such surplus space and excess capacity for use by cable television corportions.

(c) Whenever a public utility and a cable television corporation or association of cable television corporations are unable to agree upon the terms, conditions, or annual compensation for pole attachments or the terms,
 conditions, or costs of rearrangements, the commission shall establish and enforce the rates, terms, and conditions for pole attachments and rearrangements so as to assure a public utility the recovery of both of the following:

(1) A one-time reimbursement for actual costs incurred by the public utility for rearrangements performed at the request of the cable television corporation. 

(2) An annual recurring fee computed as follows:

(A) For each pole and supporting anchor actually used by the cable television corporation, for a period of four years following the effective date of this section, the annual fee shall be two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50). Thereafter, the annual fee shall be two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) or 7.4 percent of the public utility’s annual cost of ownership for the pole and supporting
 anchor, whichever is greater, except that if a public utility applies for establishment of a fee in excess of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) under this section, the annual fee shall be 7.4 percent of the public utility’s annual cost of ownership for the pole and supporting anchor.

(B) For support structures used by the cable television corporation, other than poles or anchors, a percentage of the annual cost of ownership for the support structure, computed by dividing the volume or capacity rendered unusable by the cable television corporation’s equipment by the total usable volume or capacity. As used in this paragraph, “total usable volume or capacity” means all volume or capacity in which the public utility’s line, plant, or system could legally be located, including the volume or capacity rendered unusable by the cable television corporation’s equipment.

(d) In the event
 that it becomes necessary for the public utility to use space or capacity on or in a support structure occupied by the cable television corporation’s equipment, the cable television corporation shall either (1) pay all costs for rearrangements necessary to maintain the pole attachment or (2) remove its cable television equipment at its own expense.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 652, Sec. 2.   Effective July 20, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

767.7.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Legislature has encouraged, and continues to encourage, the rapid and economic development of telecommunications services to all Californians.

(2) Pursuant to Section 767.5, public utilities have dedicated a portion of their support structures to cable television corporations which have been increasingly attaching fiber optic cable that is capable of
 a variety of telecommunications uses. Other utilities not under the jurisdiction of the commission have also made the same dedication.

(3) Public utility and publicly owned utility support structures are also used by entities, other than cable television corporations, with the acquiescence of the public utility and voluntary permission of the publicly owned utility, for the purpose of installing fiber optic cable in order to provide various telecommunications services.

(4) Electric public utilities are currently installing fiber optic cables on their systems to enhance their operations and better serve their customers. Fiber optic cables installed by telephone, cable, and other telecommunications corporations may be accessed by electric public utilities and publicly owned utilities to enhance their operations and better serve their customers. The access may be accomplished by
 contract or through the purchase of tariffed services.

(b) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature that public utilities and publicly owned utilities be fairly and adequately compensated for the use of their rights-of-way and easements for the installation of fiber optic cable, and that electric public utilities and publicly owned utilities have the ability, if they so desire, to negotiate a purchase, lease, or rent of access to those fiber optic cables for their own use. 

(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to change existing law with respect to Section 767.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 623, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

768.

The commission may, after a hearing, require every public utility to construct, maintain, and operate its line, plant, system, equipment, apparatus, tracks, and premises in a manner so as to promote and safeguard the health and safety of its employees, passengers, customers, and the public. The commission may prescribe, among other things, the installation, use, maintenance, and operation of appropriate safety or other devices or appliances, including interlocking and other protective devices at grade crossings or junctions and block or other systems of signaling.
 The commission may establish uniform or other standards of construction and equipment, and require the performance of any other act which the health or safety of its employees, passengers, customers, or the public may demand. The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall have the primary responsibility for the regulation of the safety of operation of passenger stage corporations. The commission shall cooperate with the Department of the California Highway Patrol to ensure safe operation of these carriers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 21.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

768.5.

The commission may, after a hearing, by general or special orders, rules, or otherwise, require every cable television corporation to construct, maintain, and operate its plant, system, equipment, apparatus, and premises in such manner as to promote and safeguard the health and safety of its employees, customers, and the public, and may prescribe, among other things, the installation, use, maintenance, and operation of appropriate safety or other devices or appliances, establish uniform or other standards of construction and equipment, and require the performance of any other act which the health or safety of its employees, customers, or the public may demand.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to either grant or deny a cable antenna television corporation the right to use the easement of a public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

768.6.

(a) The commission shall establish standards for disaster and emergency preparedness plans within an existing proceeding, including, but not limited to, use of weather reports to preposition manpower and equipment before anticipated severe weather, methods of improving communications between governmental agencies and the public, and methods of working to control and mitigate an emergency or disaster and its aftereffects. The commission, when establishing standards
 pursuant to this subdivision, may make requirements for small water corporations similar to those imposed on class A water corporations under paragraph (2) of subdivision (f).

(b) An electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218, providing service in California shall develop, adopt, and update an emergency and disaster preparedness plan in compliance with the standards established by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a).

(1) (A) In developing and adopting an emergency and disaster preparedness plan, an electrical corporation providing service in California shall invite appropriate representatives of every city, county, or city and county within that electrical corporation’s service area in California to meet with, and provide consultation to, the electrical corporation.

(B) Every city,
 county, or city and county within the electrical corporation’s service area in California may designate a point of contact for the electrical corporation to consult with on emergency and disaster preparedness plans.

(C) The electrical corporation shall provide the point of contact designated pursuant to subparagraph (B) with an opportunity to comment on draft emergency and disaster preparedness plans.

(2) For the purposes of best preparing an electrical corporation for future emergencies or disasters, an emergency and disaster preparedness plan shall address recent emergencies and disasters associated with the electrical corporation or similarly situated corporations, and shall address remedial actions for possible emergencies or disasters that may involve that corporation’s provision of service.

(3) Every two years,
 in order to update and improve that electrical corporation’s emergency and disaster preparedness plan, an electrical corporation providing service in California shall invite appropriate representatives of every city, county, or city and county within that electrical corporation’s service area to meet with, and provide consultation to, the electrical corporation.

(4) For the purposes of best preparing an electrical corporation for future emergencies or disasters, an electrical corporation updating its emergency and disaster preparedness plan shall review the disasters and emergencies that have affected similarly situated corporations since the adoption of the plan, remedial actions taken during those emergencies or disasters, and proposed changes to the plan. The electrical corporation shall adopt in its plan the changes that will best ensure the electrical corporation is reasonably prepared to deal with a disaster or emergency.

(c) A meeting pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be noticed and shall be conducted in a public meeting that allows for the participation of appropriate representatives of counties and cities within the electrical corporation’s service area.

(1) A county participating in a meeting pursuant to subdivision (b) may inform each city within the county of the time and place of the meeting.

(2) An electrical corporation holding a meeting pursuant to subdivision (b) shall provide participating counties and cities with the opportunity to provide written and verbal input regarding the corporation’s emergency and disaster preparedness plan. For purposes of this public meeting, an electrical corporation may convene a closed meeting with representatives from every city, county, or city and county within that electrical corporation’s
 service area to discuss sensitive security-related information in the electrical corporation’s emergency and disaster preparedness plan and to solicit comment.

(3) An electrical corporation shall notify the commission of the date, time, and location of a meeting pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) An electrical corporation shall conduct a meeting pursuant to subdivision (b) no later than April 1, 2013, and every two years thereafter.

(e) An electrical corporation shall memorialize a meeting pursuant to subdivision (b), and shall submit its records of the meeting to the commission.

(f) (1) A water company regulated by the commission shall develop, adopt, and update an emergency and disaster preparedness plan in compliance with the
 standards established by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a). This requirement shall be deemed fulfilled when the water company files an emergency and disaster preparedness plan pursuant to another state statutory requirement.

(2) A water company developing, adopting, or updating an emergency and disaster preparedness plan pursuant to paragraph (1) shall hold meetings with representatives from each city, county, or city and county in the water company’s service area regarding the emergency and disaster preparedness plan.

(g) An electrical corporation or a water corporation may fulfill a meeting requirement imposed by this section by making a presentation regarding its emergency and disaster preparedness plan at a regularly scheduled public meeting of each disaster council created pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 8610) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of
 the Government Code within the corporation’s service area, or at a regularly scheduled public meeting of the governing body of each city, county, or city and county within the service area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.   (AB 1650)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

769.

(a) For purposes of this section, “distributed resources” means distributed renewable generation resources, energy efficiency, energy storage, electric vehicles, and demand response technologies.

(b) Not later than July 1, 2015, each electrical corporation shall submit to the commission a distribution resources plan proposal to identify optimal
 locations for the deployment of distributed resources. Each proposal shall do all of the following:

(1) Evaluate locational benefits and costs of distributed resources located on the distribution system. This evaluation shall be based on reductions or increases in local generation capacity needs, avoided or increased investments in distribution infrastructure, safety benefits, reliability benefits, and any other savings the distributed resources provide to the electrical grid or costs to ratepayers of the electrical corporation.

(2) Propose or identify standard tariffs, contracts, or other mechanisms for the deployment of cost-effective distributed resources that satisfy distribution planning objectives.

(3) Propose cost-effective methods of effectively coordinating existing commission-approved programs, incentives,
 and tariffs to maximize the locational benefits and minimize the incremental costs of distributed resources.

(4) Identify any additional utility spending necessary to integrate cost-effective distributed resources into distribution planning consistent with the goal of yielding net benefits to ratepayers.

(5) Identify barriers to the deployment of distributed resources, including, but not limited to, safety standards related to technology or operation of the distribution circuit in a manner that ensures reliable service.

(c) The commission shall review each distribution resources plan proposal submitted by an electrical corporation and approve, or modify and approve, a distribution resources plan for the corporation. The commission may modify any plan as appropriate to minimize overall system costs and maximize
 ratepayer benefit from investments in distributed resources.

(d) Any electrical corporation spending on distribution infrastructure necessary to accomplish the distribution resources plan shall be proposed and considered as part of the next general rate case for the corporation. The commission may approve proposed spending if it concludes that ratepayers would realize net benefits and the associated costs are just and reasonable. The commission may also adopt criteria, benchmarks, and accountability mechanisms to evaluate the success of any investment authorized pursuant to a distribution resources plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 151.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

769.2.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1720 of the Labor Code, construction of a renewable electrical generation facility, and associated battery storage, after December 31, 2023, that receives service pursuant to the standard contract or tariff developed pursuant to Section 2827.1, shall constitute a public works project for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, except as specified in subdivision (f).

(b) A contractor who enters into a contract to perform work on a renewable electrical generation facility or associated battery storage described in subdivision (a) shall do all of the
 following:

(1) The contractor shall pay each construction worker employed in the execution of the work, at minimum, the general prevailing rate of per diem wages, except that an apprentice registered in a program approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards shall be paid, at minimum, the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(2) The contractor shall maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code and make those records available for inspection and copying as provided in that section. Notwithstanding Section 1776 of the Labor Code, the contractor shall not be required to provide copies of certified payroll records to any entity other than the Department of Industrial Relations and the commission.

(3) The contractor shall biannually, on July 1 and December 31 of each year, submit to the commission digital copies of its certified payroll records, in a format consistent with systems used for compliance with Section 1776 of the Labor Code, for projects subject to this section. The commission shall retain these records as public records for five years.

(c) The requirement imposed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may be enforced through any of the following mechanisms:

(1) Within 18 months after completing the renewable electrical generation facility, by the
 Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code.

(2) By an underpaid construction worker or apprentice through an administrative complaint or civil action.

(3) By a joint labor-management committee through a civil action pursuant to Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code.

(d) If a willful violation of this section has been enforced against a contractor for the construction of a renewable electrical generation facility pursuant to subdivision (c), that facility shall
 remain eligible to receive service pursuant to a standard contract or tariff developed pursuant to Section 2827 or 2827.1 if restitution has been made to the affected workers and all associated penalties and fines have been paid.

(e) The commission shall require each large electrical corporation to include the requirements of this section in each
 standard contract or tariff offered pursuant to Section 2827.1.

(f) (1) This section does not apply to a residential renewable electrical generation facility that is eligible to receive service pursuant to the standard contract or tariff developed pursuant to Section 2827.1 and has a maximum generating capacity of 15 kilowatts or less of electricity.

(2) This section does not apply to a residential renewable electrical generation facility that is eligible to receive service pursuant to the standard contract or tariff developed pursuant to Section 2827.1 and that is installed on a single-family home.

(3) This section does not apply to a project that is a public work, as defined in Section
 1720 of the Labor Code, and that is subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(4) This section does not apply to a renewable electrical generation facility that serves only a modular home, a modular home community, or multiunit housing that has two or fewer stories.

(g) (1) The entity that engaged the contractor
 to perform work on a renewable electrical generation facility and associated battery storage described in subdivision (a) is not an awarding body, as defined in Section 1722 of the Labor Code. Public works project requirements not found in this section do not apply to the entity. This section does not affect the entity’s liability for nonpayment of wages or materials under Section 3 of Article XIV of the California Constitution.

(2) The contractor who enters into a contract with the entity described in paragraph (1) to perform work on a renewable electrical generation facility and associated battery storage described in subdivision (a) is the awarding body only for the limited purposes of Section 1773.3 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 632, Sec. 1.   (AB 1104)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

769.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Community choice aggregator” has the same meaning as defined in Section 331.1.

(2) “Customer renewable energy subscription program” does not include the net energy metering program specified in Sections 2827 and 2827.1 or the Multifamily Affordable Housing Solar Roofs Program established pursuant to Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 2870) of Part 2. “Customer renewable energy subscription program” includes an alternative designed for growth among residential customers in
 disadvantaged communities pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2827.1.

(3) “Low-income customer” means either of the following:

(A) An individual or household who qualifies for one or more of the following programs:

(i) The California Alternate Rates for Energy (CARE) program described in Section 739.1.

(ii) The Family Electric Rate Assistance (FERA) program described in Section 739.12.

(iii) The CalFresh program established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(iv) The federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) (Chapter 51 (commencing with Section 2011) of Title 7 of the United States Code).

(v) The Low-income Heating Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 8621).

(B) An individual or household who resides within an underserved community.

(4) “Underserved community” includes each of the following:

(A) A “low-income community” as defined in Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A community within an area identified as among the 25 percent most disadvantaged areas in the state according to the California Environmental Protection Agency and based on the most recent California Communities Environmental Health Screening Tool, also known as
 CalEnviroScreen, that is used to identify disadvantaged communities pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) A community located on lands belonging to a California Native American tribe, as defined in Section 21073 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) On or before March 31, 2024, the commission shall, in a new or existing proceeding, do both of the following:

(1) (A) Evaluate each customer renewable energy subscription program, including
 the Green Tariff Shared Renewables Program (Chapter 7.6 (commencing with Section 2831) of Part
 2) and any program established as an alternative designed for growth among residential customers in disadvantaged communities pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2827.1, to determine if the program meets all of the following goals:
